Utah statutes.
26-2-5.5.   Requirement to obtain parents' social security numbers.

(1)  For each live birth that occurs in this state, the administrator of the birthing facility, as defined in Section 26-2-5, or other person responsible for completing and filing the birth certificate under Section 26-2-5 shall obtain the social security numbers of each parent and provide those numbers to the state registrar.

(2)  Each parent shall furnish his or her social security number to the person authorized to obtain the numbers under Subsection (1) unless a court or administrative agency has determined  there is good cause for not furnishing a number under Subsection (1).

(3)  The state registrar shall, as soon as practicable, supply those social security numbers to the Office of Recovery Services within the Department of Human Services.

(4)  The social security numbers obtained under this section may not be recorded on the child's birth certificate.

(5)  The state may not use any social security number obtained under this section for any reason other than enforcement of child support orders in accordance with the federal Family Support Act of 1988, Public Law 100-485.



Amended by Chapter 202, 1995 General Session

